North Dakota statutes. TITLE 14 Domestic Relations and Persons
CHAPTER 14-14.1 Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act
14-14.1-28. (308)
Expedited enforcement of child custody determination.

A petition under sections 14-14.1-22 through 14-14.1-37 must be verified. Certified copies of all orders sought to be enforced and of any order confirming registration must be attached to the petition. A copy of a certified copy of an order may be attached instead of the original.

A petition for enforcement of a child custody determination must state:

Whether the court that issued the determination identified the jurisdictional basis it relied upon in exercising jurisdiction and, if so, what the basis was;

Whether the determination for which enforcement is sought has been vacated, stayed, or modified by a court whose decision must be enforced under this chapter and, if so, identify the court, the case number, and the nature of the proceeding;

Whether any proceeding has been commenced that could affect the current proceeding, including proceedings relating to domestic violence, protective orders, termination of parental rights, and adoptions and, if so, identify the court, the case number, and the nature of the proceeding;

The present physical address of the child and the respondent, if known;

Whether relief in addition to the immediate physical custody of the child and attorney’s fees is sought, including a request for assistance from law enforcement officials and, if so, the relief sought; and

If the child custody determination has been registered and confirmed under section 14-14.1-25, the date and place of registration.

Upon the filing of a petition, the court shall issue an order directing the respondent to appear in person with or without the child at a hearing and may enter any order necessary to ensure the safety of the parties and the child. The hearing must be held on the next judicial day after service of the order unless that date is impossible. In that event, the court shall hold the hearing on the first judicial day possible. The court may extend the date of hearing at the request of the petitioner.

An order issued under subsection 3 must state the time and place of the hearing and advise the respondent that at the hearing the court may order that the petitioner take immediate physical custody of the child and may order the payment of fees, costs, and expenses under section 14-14.1-32, and may schedule a hearing to determine whether further relief is appropriate, unless the respondent appears and establishes that:

The child custody determination has not been registered and confirmed under section 14-14.1-25 and that:

The issuing court did not have jurisdiction under sections 14-14.1-12 through 14-14.1-21;

The child custody determination for which enforcement is sought has been vacated, stayed, or modified by a court having jurisdiction to do so under sections 14-14.1-12 through 14-14.1-21; or

The respondent was entitled to notice, but notice was not given in accordance with section 14-14.1-07, in the proceedings before the court that issued the order for which enforcement is sought; or

The child custody determination for which enforcement is sought was registered and confirmed under section 14-14.1-24, but has been vacated, stayed, or modified by a court of a state having jurisdiction to do so under sections 14-14.1-12 through 14-14.1-21.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 147, § 1.

Law Reviews.

The Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction & Enforcement Act (UCCJEA) — A Metamorphosis of the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Act, 75 N.D. L. Rev. 301 (1999).

14-14.1-29. (309)
Service of petition and order.

Except as otherwise provided in section 14-14.1-31, the petition and order must be served, by any method authorized by the law of this state, upon the respondent and any person who has physical custody of the child.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 147, § 1.

14-14.1-30. (310)
Hearing and order.

Unless the court issues a temporary emergency order under section 14-14.1-15, upon a finding that a petitioner is entitled to immediate physical custody of the child, the court shall order that the petitioner may take immediate physical custody of the child unless the respondent establishes that:

The child custody determination has not been registered and confirmed under section 14-14.1-25 and that:

The issuing court did not have jurisdiction under sections 14-14.1-12 through 14-14.1-21;

The child custody determination for which enforcement is sought has been vacated, stayed, or modified by a court of a state having jurisdiction to do so under sections 14-14.1-12 through 14-14.1-21; or

The respondent was entitled to notice, but notice was not given in accordance with section 14-14.1-07, in the proceedings before the court that issued the order for which enforcement is sought; or

The child custody determination for which enforcement is sought was registered and confirmed under section 14-14.1-25 but has been vacated, stayed, or modified by a court of a state having jurisdiction to do so under sections 14-14.1-12 through 14-14.1-21.

The court shall award the fees, costs, and expenses authorized under section 14-14.1-32 and may grant additional relief, including a request for the assistance of law enforcement officials, and set a further hearing to determine whether additional relief is appropriate.

If a party called to testify refuses to answer on the ground that the testimony may be self-incriminating, the court may draw an adverse inference from the refusal.

A privilege against disclosure of communications between spouses and a defense of immunity based on the relationship of husband and wife or parent and child may not be invoked in a proceeding under sections 14-14.1-22 through 14-14.1-37.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 147, § 1.

14-14.1-31. (311)
Warrant to take physical custody of child.

Upon the filing of a petition seeking enforcement of a child custody determination, the petitioner may file a verified application for the issuance of a warrant to take physical custody of the child if the child is immediately likely to suffer serious physical harm or be removed from this state.

If the court, upon the testimony of the petitioner or other witness, finds that the child is imminently likely to suffer serious physical harm or be removed from this state, it may issue a warrant to take physical custody of the child. The petition must be heard on the next judicial day after the warrant is executed unless that date is impossible. In that event, the court shall hold the hearing on the first judicial day possible. The application for the warrant must include the statements required by subsection 2 of section 14-14.1-28.

A warrant to take physical custody of a child must:

Recite the facts upon which a conclusion of imminent serious physical harm or removal from the jurisdiction is based;

Direct law enforcement officers to take physical custody of the child immediately; and

Provide for the placement of the child pending final relief.

The respondent must be served with the petition, warrant, and order immediately after the child is taken into physical custody.

A warrant to take physical custody of a child is enforceable throughout this state. If the court finds on the basis of the testimony of the petitioner or other witness that a less intrusive remedy is not effective, it may authorize law enforcement officers to enter private property to take physical custody of the child. If required by exigent circumstances of the case, the court may authorize law enforcement officers to make a forcible entry at any hour.

The court may impose conditions upon placement of a child to ensure the appearance of the child and the child’s custodian.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 147, § 1.

14-14.1-32. (312)
Costs, fees, and expenses.

The court shall award the prevailing party, including a state, necessary and reasonable expenses incurred by or on behalf of the party, including costs, communication expenses, attorney’s fees, investigative fees, expenses for witnesses, travel expenses, and child care during the course of the proceedings, unless the party from whom fees or expenses are sought establishes that the award would be clearly inappropriate.

The court may not assess fees, costs, or expenses against a state unless authorized by law other than this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 147, § 1.

14-14.1-33. (313)
Recognition and enforcement.

A court of this state shall accord full faith and credit to an order issued by another state and consistent with this chapter which enforces a child custody determination by a court of another state unless the order has been vacated, stayed, or modified by a court having jurisdiction to do so under sections 14-14.1-12 through 14-14.1-21.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 147, § 1.

14-14.1-34. (314)
Appeals.

An appeal may be taken from a final order in a proceeding under sections 14-14.1-22 through 14-14.1-37 in accordance with expedited appellate procedures in other civil cases. Unless the court enters a temporary emergency order under section 14-14.1-24, the enforcing court may not stay an order enforcing a child custody determination pending appeal.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 147, § 1.

14-14.1-35. (315)
Role of state’s attorney.

In a case arising under this chapter or involving the Hague convention on the civil aspects of international child abduction, the state’s attorney may take any lawful action, including resort to a proceeding under sections 14-14.1-22 through 14-14.1-37 or any other available civil proceeding to locate a child, obtain the return of a child, or enforce a child custody determination if there is:

An existing child custody determination;

A request to do so from a court in a pending child custody proceeding;

A reasonable belief that a criminal statute has been violated; or

A reasonable belief that the child has been wrongfully removed or retained in violation of the Hague convention on the civil aspects of international child abduction.

A state’s attorney acting under this section acts on behalf of the court and may not represent any party.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 147, § 1.

Collateral References.

Construction and application of provision of Hague Convention on civil aspects of international child abduction specifying one-year period for parent to file for return of child wrongfully removed from or retained outside country of habitual residence, as implemented in International Child Abduction Remedies Act, 42 U.S.C. § 11603(b), (f)(3), 79 A.L.R. Fed. 2d 481.

Law Reviews.

The Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction & Enforcement Act (UCCJEA) — A Metamorphosis of the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Act, 75 N.D. L. Rev. 301 (1999).

14-14.1-36. (316)
Role of law enforcement.

At the request of a state’s attorney acting under section 14-14.1-35, a law enforcement officer may take any lawful action reasonably necessary to locate a child or a party and assist a state’s attorney with responsibilities under section 14-14.1-35.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 147, § 1.

14-14.1-37. (317)
Costs and expenses.

If the respondent is not the prevailing party, the court may assess against the respondent all direct expenses and costs incurred by the state’s attorney and law enforcement officers under section 14-14.1-35 or 14-14.1-36.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 147, § 1.